ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/nb_NO/hyph_nb_NO.dic
UTF-8
% ADOBE CONFIDENTIAL
% ___________________
%
%  Copyright ©2011 Adobe Systems Incorporated
%  All Rights Reserved.
%
% NOTICE:  All information contained herein is, and remains
% the property of Adobe Systems Incorporated and its suppliers,
% if any.  The intellectual and technical concepts contained
% herein are proprietary to Adobe Systems Incorporated and its
% suppliers and are protected by trade secret or copyright law.
% Dissemination of this information or reproduction of this material
% is strictly forbidden unless prior written permission is obtained
% from Adobe Systems Incorporated.
%
% Version 1.0.1
%
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDLEFTHYPHENMIN 1
COMPOUNDRIGHTHYPHENMIN 1
NOHYPHEN -,',’
1-1
1'1
1’1
NEXTLEVEL
.a2
.amerikanskok9kupert2e./kk=,12,1
.a1me
.ame1ri
.ameri1ka
.amerikans2k
.amerikanskok1ku
.amerikanskok1kup
.amerikanskokku1pe
.amerikanskokkuper1te
.bambus9sko2g./ss=,6,1
.1b
.bam1b
.bambu2ss
.bambus1skog
.bas9soli2st./ss=,3,1
.ba2ss
.basso1li
.bas9soliste2n./ss=,3,1
.bassolis1te
.bas9soloe2n./ss=,3,1
.basso1lo
.bassolo1e
.bas9stemm2e./ss=,3,1
.bass2t
.bas1s1te
.basstem1m
.basstem1me
.bevis9system./ss=,5,1
.be1v
.be1vi
.bevi2ss
.bevis1sy
.bevissys1te
.bi3sk
.biskop9palas2s./pp=,6,1
.biskop2pa
.biskop2pal
.biskoppa1la
.biskoppala2ss
.boikot9ting2a./tt=,6,1
.boi1ko
.boiko2tt
.boikot1ti
.boikottin1ga
.bonus9spo2r./ss=,5,1
.bo1nu
.bonus1sp
.bonu2ss
.breddefotbal9la2g./ll=,12,1
.bre2dd
.bred1de
.bredde1f
.bredde1fo
.breddefot1b
.breddefotbal1la
.bus9selska2p./ss=,3,1
.bu2ss
.bus1se
.busse2l1s
.bussels2k
.bussel1skap
.bus9selskap2a./ss=,3,1
.bussels3ka1pa
.bus9selskapet./ss=,3,1
.busselska1pe
.bus9sjåfø2r./ss=,3,1
.bus1sj
.bussjå1f
.bus9sjåføre2n./ss=,3,1
.bussjåfø1re
.bus9spyttkjertele2n./ss=,3,1
.bus1sp
.busspy2tt
.busspytt1k
.busspyttkjer1te
.busspyttkjerte1le
.bus9sta3sjo2n./ss=,3,1
.bus1s2t
.bus1sta
.bussta1sj
.busstasjon2
.bus9stop2p./ss=,3,1
.bus9stoppet./ss=,3,1
.busstop1pe
.byg9gry2n./gg=,3,1
.by2gg
.byg1gr2
.d2
.danskok9kupert2e./kk=,7,1
.1da
.dans2k
.danskok1ku
.danskok1kup
.danskokku1pe
.danskokkuper1te
.dilet9tant./tt=,5,1
.1di
.di1le
.di3let
.dile2tt
.dilet1ta
.dilet2t1an
.domstol9lov2a./ll=,7,1
.doms2
.dom1sto
.domstol1lo
.domstollo1va
.e2
.ekspres9siv2e./ss=,7,1
.1ek1sp
.e2ks
.eksp2re2ss
.ekspres1si
.ekspressi1ve
.f2
.fjel9landet./ll=,4,1
.fjel1la
.fjellan1de
.flus9syr2a./ss=,4,1
.1fl
.flu2ss
.flus1sy
.flussy1ra
.flus9syr2e./ss=,4,1
.flussy1re
.fo2rs4
.forstop9pel3s2e./pp=,7,1
.for1st
.forstop1pe
.forstoppe2l1s
.forstoppel1se
.fotbal9lag2a./ll=,6,1
.fot1b
.fotbal1la
.fotballa1ga
.fotbal9landskampe2n./ll=,6,1
.fotballands1kam
.fotballandskam1p
.fotbal9landsla2g./ll=,6,1
.fotballand1sla
.fotbal9landslaget./ll=,6,1
.fotballandsla1ge
.fotbal9ligae2n./ll=,6,1
.fotbal1li
.fotbal1lig
.fotballi1ga
.fotballiga1e
.franskok9kupert2e./kk=,8,1
.frans2k
.franskok1ku
.franskok1kup
.franskokku1pe
.franskokkuper1te
.ful2
.ful9last2a./ll=,3,1
.ful1la
.fullas1ta
.g2
.gas9selska2p./ss=,3,1
.1ga
.ga2ss
.gas1se
.gasse2l1s
.gassels2k
.gassel1skap
.gas9selskapet./ss=,3,1
.gasselska1pe
.grafik9kort./kk=,6,1
.1gr2
.gra1f2i
.grafik3kort
.grafik9kortet./kk=,6,1
.grafikkor1te2
.gul9laget./ll=,3,1
.gul1la
.gulla1ge
.hal9land./ll=,3,1
.1h
.hal1la
.hal9land2s./ll=,3,1
.jus9student./ss=,3,1
.jus1s2t
.ju2ss
.jusst2ud
.jusstu1de
.jus9studi2a./ss=,3,1
.jusstu1di
.jusstu3dia
.jus9studi3et./ss=,3,1
.jusstu3die
.justis9samarbeid./ss=,6,1
.jus1tis
.justi2ss
.justis1sa
.justis3sam
.justissa2ma
.justissam1ar
.justissama2r1b
.justis9sekretæ2r./ss=,6,1
.justis1se
.justisse1kr
.justissekre1tæ
.k2
.kasus9språ2k./ss=,5,1
.1kas
.ka1su
.ka1sus
.kasus1sp
.kasu2ss
.kasus1språ
.kasus9system./ss=,5,1
.kasus1sy
.kasussys1te
.kasus9systemet./ss=,5,1
.kasussyste4me4
.kasussyste4met
.kilowat9tim2e./tt=,7,1
.ki1lo
.kilo1wa
.kilowa2tt
.kilowat1ti
.kilowat3ti1me
.kles9selskapet./ss=,4,1
.kle2s1s
.kles1se
.klesse2l1s
.klessels2k
.klessel1skap
.klesselska1pe
.kles9s2ti2l./ss=,4,1
.kles3s2t
.klessti2l
.kles9stile2n./ss=,4,1
.klessti3le
.klesstil2en
.kles9stiv2e./ss=,4,1
.klessti1ve
.kongres9sente2r./ss=,7,1
.kon1gr2
.kong2re2ss
.kongr3essent
.kongres1se
.kongressen1te
.koordinat9transforma3sjo2n./tt=,9,1
.ko1or
.koor3di
.koordi1na
.koordina2tt
.koordinat1tr
.koordinattran2s1f
.koordinattrans3fo
.koordinattransfor1ma
.koordinattransforma1sj
.koordinattransformasjon2
.kul9lage2r./ll=,3,1
.kul1la
.kulla1ge
.kvadrat9tomm2e./tt=,7,1
.kva1d
.kva1dra
.kvadra2tt
.kvadrattom1m
.kvadrattom1me
.kvinnefotbal9laget./ll=,12,1
.kvin2nef
.kvin1ne
.kvinne1fo
.kvinnefot1b
.kvinnefotbal1la
.kvinnefotballa1ge
.lokalkasus9system./ss=,10,1
.lo1ka
.lokal1k
.lokal1kas
.lokalka1su
.lokalka1sus
.lokalkasu2ss
.lokalkasus1sy
.lokalkasussys1te
.lokal9lag2a./ll=,5,1
.lokal1la
.lokalla1ga
.lokal9laget./ll=,5,1
.lokalla1ge
.lokal9lagsforman2n./ll=,5,1
.lokal2la2gs
.lokallag2s1f
.lokallags3fo
.lokallagsfor1ma
.lokal9lagsmøt2e./ll=,5,1
.lokallags1m
.lokallagsmø1te
.luksus9skipet./ss=,6,1
.lu2ks
.luk1su
.luk1sus
.luksu2ss
.luksus1skip
.luksusski1pe
.luksus9suit2e./ss=,6,1
.luksus3su
.luksussu1it
.luksussui1te
.magnet9tromme2l./tt=,6,1
.1ma
.mag1ne
.magn1et1tr
.magne2tt
.magnet3trom
.magnettrom1m
.magnettrom1me
.manus9skriftet./ss=,5,1
.ma1nu
.manu2ss
.manusskri2ft
.manusskrif1te
.meteorolog9grup1p2e./gg=,10,1
.1me
.me1te
.mete1or
.meteo1ro
.meteoro1lo
.meteorolo2gg
.meteorolog1gr2
.meteorologgrup3
.meteorologgrupp2
.meteorologgrup1pe
.meteorolog9gruppen2e./gg=,10,1
.meteorologgruppe1ne
.minus9sid2a./ss=,5,1
.1mi
.mi1nu
.minu2ss
.minus1si
.minussi1da
.mobiltelefonap9parat./pp=,14,1
.1mo
.mo2b
.mo3bi
.mobil1te
.mobilte1le
.mobiltele1fo
.mobiltelefo2n1a
.mobiltelefonap1pa
.mobiltelefonappa1ra
.nat9to2g./tt=,3,1
.na2tt
.nat3tog
.nat9toget./tt=,3,1
.natto1ge
.naturgas9selskapet./ss=,8,1
.na1tu
.natur1g
.natur1ga
.naturga2ss
.naturgas1se
.naturgasse2l1s
.naturgassels2k
.naturgassel1skap
.naturgasselska1pe
.o2
.op9pussin2g./pp=,2,1
.op1pu
.oppu2ss
.oppus1si
.op9pussing2a./pp=,2,1
.oppussin1ga
.op9pussingsarbeidet./pp=,2,1
.oppussin2g2s
.oppussings1a
.oppussingsa2r1b
.oppussingsarbei1de
.p2
.pirat9ta1p2e./tt=,5,1
.pi1rat
.pira2tt
.pirat1ta
.piratta1pe
.pop9preg2a./pp=,3,1
.popp3r
.poppre1ga
.potet9ty1p2e./tt=,5,1
.po1te
.pote2tt
.potet3typ
.potetty1pe
.potet9type2n./tt=,5,1
.proses9styrin2g./ss=,6,1
.p2ro
.pro1se
.proses3s2t
.prose2ss
.prosessty1ri
.r2
.rakettap9parat./pp=,8,1
.ra1ke
.rake2tt
.raket1ta
.rakettap1pa
.rakettappa1ra
.replik9kunste2n./kk=,6,1
.re1pl
.replik2ku
.replik1kun
.replikkunst3en
.replikkuns2t
.replikkuns1te
.rib9bei2n./bb=,3,1
.ri1b
.ri2b1b
.rib9bei1n2a./bb=,3,1
.ribbei1na
.rib9beinet./bb=,3,1
.ribbei1ne
.rib9beinsskad2e./bb=,3,1
.ribbein2s1s
.ribbeinsska1de
.rib9beinsskade2n./bb=,3,1
.ryk9kin2n./kk=,3,1
.ryk1ki
.s2
.signalap9parat./pp=,8,1
.1si
.sig1na
.signalap1pa
.signalappa1ra
.skagerrak9kyste2n./kk=,9,1
.ska1ge
.skager1r
.skager2r1ak
.skagerrakkys1te
.skog9gangsman2n./gg=,4,1
.1skog
.sko2gg
.skog1ga
.skoggan2gs
.skoggangs1m
.skoggangs1ma
.skog9gangsmanne2n./gg=,4,1
.skoggangsman3ne
.skog9gangsmen2n./gg=,4,1
.skoggangs1me
.skys9skift2e./ss=,4,1
.s3kys
.sky2ss
.skysski2ft
.skysskif1te
.skys9sta3sjo2n./ss=,4,1
.skys1s2t
.skys1sta
.skyssta1sj
.skysstasjon2
.skys9stasjone2n./ss=,4,1
.skyssta3sjo1ne
.sop9part./pp=,3,1
.2s1op
.sop2pa
.stabsmusik9korp2s./kk=,10,1
.sta1b
.sta2bs
.stabsmu1si
.stabsmusik1ko
.stabsmusikko2rp
.stik9kontakt./kk=,4,1
.stik1kon
.stikkon1ta
.straf9fang2e./ff=,5,1
.straf2fa
.straffan1ge
.straf9fange2n./ff=,5,1
.svenskok9kupert2e./kk=,8,1
.svens2k
.svenskok1ku
.svenskok1kup
.svenskokku1pe
.svenskokkuper1te
.t2
.telefonap9parat./pp=,9,1
.1te
.te1le
.tele1fo
.telefo2n1a
.telefonap1pa
.telefonappa1ra
.top9plasse2n./pp=,3,1
.topp3l
.toppla2ss
.topplas1se
.top9plasserin2g./pp=,3,1
.topplasse1ri
.top9plassering2a./pp=,3,1
.topplasserin1ga
.top9punkt./pp=,3,1
.top1pu
.top9punktet./pp=,3,1
.toppunk1te
.trafik9knutepunkt./kk=,6,1
.tra1f2i
.trafikknu1te
.trafikknute1pu
.trafik9kor2k./kk=,6,1
.trafikko2rk
.trafik9kultu2r./kk=,6,1
.trafik2ku
.trafikkul1tu
.trek9kraft./kk=,4,1
.trek1kr
.trek1kraf
.trekkra2ft
.trek9kraft2a./kk=,4,1
.turnus9sta3sjo2n./ss=,6,1
.turnus1s2t
.turnu2ss
.turnus1sta
.turnussta1sj
.turnusstasjon2
.vas9sag2a./ss=,3,1
.va2ss
.vas1sa
.vassa1ga
.vas9sagen2e./ss=,3,1
.vassa1ge
.vassage1ne
.vas9sju2k./ss=,3,1
.vas1sj
.vas9s3ki./ss=,3,1
.vass1k
.vas9skorp2a./ss=,3,1
.vassko2rp
.vasskor1pa
.vas9spissmu2s./ss=,3,1
.vass1p
.va2sspi2ss
.vasspiss1m
.vas9spissmu1s2a./ss=,3,1
.vas9sport./ss=,3,1
.vas9stand./ss=,3,1
.vass2t
.vas1sta
.vass2tand
.vas9stande2n./ss=,3,1
.vasstan1de
.vas9stof2f./ss=,3,1
.vokal9lengd2e./ll=,5,1
.1vok
.vo1ka
.vokal1le
.vokalleng1d
.vokalleng1de
.vokal9linj2a./ll=,5,1
.vokal1li
.vokallin1j
.vokal9linj2e./ll=,5,1
.fe1d
.1fe
.famili3e2n.
.1fa
.fa1mi
.fami1li
.famili2e
.famili1en
.for3e3n2e.
.f2ore
.fore1ne
.for3ent
.for3en1l
.fore3s
.for3må
.i2
.i1n1i
.in2n
.inn3sl
.in1s
.inge3ni
.in1ge
.i1s1i
.is1k
.ik2
.ne2d
.1ne
.ne1g
.nan3
.eier3en
.ei1e2r
.eie1re
.enes4
.e1ne
.end3rin2g.
.endrin4
.er1od
.es1k
.e1s1p
.es1l
.et3s
.ek1s2t
.elev1
.e1le
.el4v
.elve4n
.el1ve
.elv3e2r.
.hand4lin4ger
.hand1l
.handlin1ge
.ha2vet
.ha1ve
.hav3et2s
.virk3nin2g.
.vi2rk
.vi1kl
.vei3e3ne
.vei1e2n
.1ve2d
.vek3s1te
.ve2ks
.veks2t
.vand3rin2g.
.vandrin4
.vandrin1g3e4
.rei3s1te
.1reis2
.res2
.res1te2
.re3ste1ne
.reste4n
.rest3e2r.
.re3str
.re4gel4m
.re1ge
.repe2n
.re1pe
.ru1ti
.røm4n
.an1s
.a1v1e
.av1a
.av1s
.aa1
.a2s1s
.as1t
.akademi3e
.aka1de
.akade1mi
.ak1k
.ap1p
.al1v
.de2ret
.1de
.de1re
.der1o
.de2s2s3
.dekor3as
.de1ko
.de4le2n
.de1le
.de1la
.da4g
.då1re
.sik1
.seie3re
.1se
.2seie
.sei1e2r
.see3ren
.se1e2
.see1re
.sa2be
.sa1b
.sær1
.sæ2
.sta3di3e
.1stad
.sta1di
.studi3er
.st2ud
.stu1di
.stu3die
.ska3la
.sys4te4me4
.sys1te
.så1re
.æ2
.ær3ens
.æ1re
.ære4n
.gran2s3kn
.grans2k
.gjernin4
.1gj
.gjer1ni
.gjer4nin1ge
.ti2l1
.tenk3n
.t3sk
.ka4tas
.ka1ta
.kjem4pet
.kjem1p
.kor3ean
.k2ore
.kore1a
.kunn1ska4
.1kun
.kunn1s2k
.prest3enes
.pres2t
.preste4n
.pres1te
.preste1ne
.prest3ens
.prest3e2rs2
.pre3sta
.lis4
.list3e2n.
.lis1te
.list3er
.løyt3
.bi1sp
.bi2te2
.bit3en2
.befin2
.be1f2i
.be4d3r2e.
.be1dr
.be1tj
.ba2k
.or2a
.or2det
.or1de
.os1
.op2pe
.oppga1ve4
.1opp1g
.opp1ga
.oppga4ver
.opp3of3
.o4be
.o2b
.o4bl
.om1
.y2
.ytel4
.y1te
.misjonæ4
.mi2s
.mi1sj
.misjon2
.mis3jo1næ2r.
.me2d
.me1d3a
.mø4d
.mød3r2e.
.mø1dr
.u2
.und3ri
.ure2n
.us2t
.utdelin4
.1ut1d
.ut1de
.utde1li
.uke4n
.u1ke
.u4ko
.å2
.års3k
.å2rs2
.ø2
.øv1es
.ø1ve
.øs2
.øst1
.øs3tr
.øy1
.ci1t
.1ci
2f.
ff1res
f2fa
ff1av
f1fo
f1fu
1f2i
fi1la
fi1o
2fn
f1nu
1fe
fe1in2
fe1no
fe1do
4fe1si4
fesi1tu4
fesitua4
fes1ti
fes3te
fes1ta
fe1t1o
fe1u
fri3sta
f1rer
fre2m
fra1s
1fa
f1an1sv
fa1vo
far3el3s2e.
fa1re
fare2l1s
farel1se
3fas
fa2ga
fak1l
fa1ku
fa1p
2f1s
f2sn
1fæ
2fæ1ri
2fære4n
fæ1re
2ft
f1ti
ft3v
ft1an
fts1ka
ft1sp
ft1sla
ft2s1ov1
ftso2
1fl
3fle
1fjo
fo2n1a
2fon1b
for1a
for1te2
for2t3er
for1tv
fos1t
fo1to
fo1li
f1om
1fy
f1m
fu3gler
full3en
ful1le
få1r
fø3f
fø2r1s2
1fé
i1fr2e.
if1re2n
i1fo
i1fu
i1i
ii1d
1in1f
i1ni
1inn1f
1inn1g
1inn1j
in2n1o
i2n1er1l
i1ne
i1na
i2n1ak
ind3rin4
ind1s
in3si
in1s2t
in1sp
i1næ
in2g2s
in1gle
in1ki
in1kv
i1no
i1nu
iefor4t
ie1fo
iefød2
ie1fø
ie1i
i1en
i3e1ne
i3ens
i2eno
i1ev
ievek1
ie1ve
i1er
ie2r3end
ie1re
i2erens
ie3ra
i2ero
ie1ru
i2e1rå2
i2e1d
ies2
ie1sa
ie1st
ie1sk
ieskri2
ie1skr
i3e1sp
ie1so
i2e1ti
i1et2s
i1e2tt
i2e1tu
ie2le
ie3len
ie1la
i1ebr
ie1b
ie1u
i1vi
ivi2rk1
iv1n
i1ve
iv1ei2
3iver1te
i2v1eg
iv1r
iv1ak
iv2s1a
iv2s1k
iv2s1l
1i1vo
i1vå
i1ri
i1re
ire1st
ir1ar
i1ras
i1rat
i1ral
ir1sk
i2rs2
irs1l
i1ru
i1an
ian2g
i1a1h
i1ar
i1as
i1ag
i1at
i1ap
i1al
ia1la
ia1lo
i1a1b
i1am
ia1ms2
idighe4
i1di
idi2g1h
i4de2rk
i1de
id2s3
id2te
idt1r
id1j
i1do
i2d1un
i1du
1idé
i2s1ind
i1si
i2s1ip
is1n
iseer3en
i1se
ise1e2
isee1re
ise2mi
is1vi
i1sa
i2s1ar2t
is3si
i2ss
is1sk
is1sp
is1ti
isti4g
iste4ren4
is1te
iste1re
is1tr
is2t3rin
is1t2a.
is1to
is1tu
i1stå
is1ki
i2sk1n
i2s1kv
is1kr
is1kj
i1sky
is1ku
is1pr
is1pa
is1l
i2s3jo1na
i1sj
isjon2
is3jonsm
isjons3
isjo4nærer
isjo3næ1re
is1un
1i2s1ut
i1æ
igen2s
i1ge
ig1ru
i1gr2
igs1k
i2gs
ig1t
ig1li
ig1le
